Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of Lading: Negotiation and Transfer.

Sec. 45.07.501.
Form of negotiation and requirements of due negotiation.

The following rules apply to a negotiable tangible document of title:

if the document’s original terms run to the order of a named person, the document is negotiated by the named person’s endorsement and delivery; after the named person’s endorsement in blank or to bearer, a person may negotiate the document by delivery alone;

if the document’s original terms run to bearer, it is negotiated by delivery alone;

if the document’s original terms run to the order of a named person and it is delivered to the named person, the effect is the same as if the document had been negotiated;

negotiation of the document after it has been endorsed to a named person requires endorsement by the named person and delivery;

a document is duly negotiated if it is negotiated in the manner stated in this subsection to a holder who purchases it in good faith, without notice of a defense against or claim to it on the part of a person, and for value, unless it is established that the negotiation is not in the regular course of business or financing or involves receiving the document in settlement or payment of a monetary obligation.

The following rules apply to a negotiable electronic document of title:

if the document’s original terms run to the order of a named person or to bearer, the document is negotiated by delivery of the document to another person; endorsement by the named person is not required to negotiate the document;

if the document’s original terms run to the order of a named person and the named person has control of the document, the effect is the same as if the document had been negotiated;

a document is duly negotiated if it is negotiated in the manner stated in this subsection to a holder who purchases it in good faith, without notice of a defense against or claim to it on the part of a person, and for value, unless it is established that the negotiation is not in the regular course of business or financing or involves taking delivery of the document in settlement or payment of a monetary obligation.

Endorsement of a nonnegotiable document of title does not make it negotiable or add to the transferee’s rights.

The naming in a negotiable bill of lading of a person to be notified of the arrival of the goods does not limit the negotiability of the bill or constitute notice to a purchaser of the bill of an interest of that person in the goods.

History.

(§ 7.501 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 68 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, repealed and reenacted the section, including the terms of the former section in (a), (c), and (d). Subsection (b), relating to negotiable electronic documents of title, was added.

Sec. 45.07.502.
Rights acquired by due negotiation.

Subject to AS

45.07.205

and

45.07.503

, a holder to whom a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated acquires by the due negotiation

title to the document;

title to the goods;

all rights accruing under the law of agency or estoppel, including rights to goods delivered to the bailee after the document was issued; and

the direct obligation of the issuer to hold or deliver the goods according to the terms of the document free of a defense or claim by the issuer except those arising under the terms of the document or under this chapter, but, in the case of a delivery order, the bailee’s obligation accrues only upon the bailee’s acceptance of the delivery order, and the obligation acquired by the holder is that the issuer and any endorser will procure the acceptance of the bailee.

Subject to AS

45.07.503

, title and rights acquired by due negotiation are not defeated by a stoppage of the goods represented by the document of title or by surrender of the goods by the bailee and are not impaired even if

the due negotiation or a prior due negotiation constituted a breach of duty;

a person has been deprived of possession of a negotiable tangible document or control of a negotiable electronic document by misrepresentation, fraud, accident, mistake, duress, loss, theft, or conversion; or

a previous sale or other transfer of the goods or document has been made to a third person.

History.

(§ 7.502 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 69 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “AS

45.07.205

and

45.07.503

” for “AS

45.07.503

and to the provisions of AS

45.07.205

on fungible goods”, and added “by the due negotiation” following “duly negotiated acquires”; in (a)(4), substituted “except those arising” for “except one arising”, added “, but,” following “under this chapter”, substituted “upon the bailee’s acceptance of the delivery order” for “upon acceptance”, and substituted “any endorser will procure” for “an endorser will procure”; rewrote (b), which read, “Subject to AS 45.07.503, title and rights so acquired are not defeated by a stoppage of the goods represented by the document or by surrender of the goods by the bailee, and are not impaired even though the negotiation or a prior negotiation constituted a breach of duty or even though a person has been deprived of possession of the document by misrepresentation, fraud, accident, mistake, duress, loss, theft, or conversion, or even though a previous sale or other transfer of the goods or document has been made to a third person.”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.503.
Document of title to goods defeated in certain cases.

A document of title confers no right in goods against a person who, before issuance of the document, had a legal interest or a perfected security interest in the goods and who did not

deliver or entrust the goods or a document of title covering the goods to the bailor or the bailor’s nominee with

actual or apparent authority to ship, store, or sell;

power to obtain delivery under AS

45.07.403

; or

power of disposition under AS

45.02.403

, AS

45.12.304(b)

,

45.12.305(b)

, AS

45.29.320

,

45.29.321(c)

or other statute or rule of law; or

acquiesce in the procurement by the bailor or its nominee of a document.

Title to goods based upon an unaccepted delivery order is subject to the rights of a person to whom a negotiable warehouse receipt or bill of lading covering the goods has been duly negotiated. That title may be defeated under AS

45.07.504

to the same extent as the rights of the issuer or a transferee from the issuer.

Title to goods based upon a bill of lading issued to a freight forwarder is subject to the rights of a person to whom a bill issued by the freight forwarder is duly negotiated. However, delivery by the carrier in accordance with AS

45.07.401

—

45.07.404

under its own bill of lading discharges the carrier’s obligation to deliver.

History.

(§ 7.503 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 14 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 70 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “security interest in the goods and who did not” for “security interest in them and who neither”; rewrote (a)(1), which read, “delivered or entrusted them or a document of title covering them to the bailor or the bailor’s nominee with actual or apparent authority to ship, store, or sell or with power to obtain delivery under AS

45.07.403

or with power of disposition under AS

45.02.403

and AS

45.29.320

or other statute or rule of law; nor”; rewrote (a)(2), which read, “acquiesced in the procurement by the bailor or the bailor’s nominee of a document of title.”; in (b), substituted “rights of a person” for “rights of anyone” in the first sentence, and substituted “That” for “Such a” at the beginning of the second sentence; in (c), substituted “rights of a person” for “rights of anyone” in the first sentence, and divided the first sentence into two sentences, with the second sentence beginning, “However, delivery by the carrier”.

Sec. 45.07.504.
Rights acquired in absence of due negotiation; effect of diversion; stoppage of delivery.

A transferee of a document of title, whether negotiable or nonnegotiable, to whom the document has been delivered but not duly negotiated, acquires the title and rights that the transferor had or had actual authority to convey.

In the case of a transfer of a nonnegotiable document of title, until, but not after, the bailee receives notice of the transfer, the rights of the transferee may be defeated

by those creditors of the transferor who could treat the transfer as void under AS

45.02.402

or AS

45.12.308

;

by a buyer from the transferor in ordinary course of business if the bailee has delivered the goods to the buyer or received notification of the buyer’s rights;

by a lessee from the transferor in ordinary course of business if the bailee has delivered the goods to the lessee or received notification of the lessee’s rights; or

as against the bailee, by good faith dealings of the bailee with the transferor.

A diversion or other change of shipping instructions by the consignor in a nonnegotiable bill of lading that causes the bailee not to deliver the goods to the consignee defeats the consignee’s title to the goods if the goods have been delivered to a buyer in ordinary course of business or a lessee in ordinary course of business and, in any event, defeats the consignee’s rights against the bailee.

Delivery of the goods under a nonnegotiable document of title may be stopped by a seller under AS

45.02.705

or a lessor under AS

45.12.526

, subject to the requirement of due notification in those sections. A bailee who honors the seller’s or lessor’s instructions is entitled to be indemnified by the seller or lessor against a resulting loss or expense.

History.

(§ 7.504 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 71 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading, deleted “the” following “Rights acquired in” and “seller’s” preceding “stoppage of delivery”; in (a), substituted “document of title, whether negotiable or nonnegotiable” for “document, whether negotiable or not”; in the introductory language of (b), substituted “transfer of a nonnegotiable document of title” for “nonnegotiable document” and substituted “notice” for “notification”; in (b)(1), substituted “transfer” for “sale” preceding “as void under” and added “or AS

45.12.308

”; added (b)(3); redesignated (b)(3) as (b)(4); in (c), added “the goods” following “not to deliver, substituted “the goods” for “they” following “title to the goods if”, and added “or a lessee in ordinary course of business” following “buyer in ordinary course of business”; rewrote (d), which read, “Delivery under a nonnegotiable document may be stopped by a seller under AS

45.02.705

, and subject to the requirement of due notification set out in AS

45.02.705

.
A bailee honoring the seller’s instructions is entitled to be indemnified by the seller against a resulting loss or expense.”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.505.
Endorser not guarantor for other parties.

The endorsement of a tangible document of title issued by a bailee does not make the endorser liable for a default by the bailee or previous endorsers.

History.

(§ 7.505 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 72 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading, deleted “a” following “Endorser not”; added “tangible” following “The endorsement of a”, and deleted “by” preceding “previous endorsers”.

Sec. 45.07.506.
Delivery without endorsement; right to compel endorsement.

The transferee of a negotiable tangible document of title has a specifically enforceable right to have its transferor supply a necessary endorsement, but the transfer becomes a negotiation only as of the time the endorsement is supplied.

History.

(§ 7.506 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 73 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2009, added “tangible” following “negotiable” and substitued “its” for “the” preceding “transferor supply”.

Sec. 45.07.507.
Warranties on negotiation or delivery of document of title.

If a person negotiates or delivers a document of title for value, other than as a mere intermediary under AS

45.07.508

, unless otherwise agreed, the transferor, in addition to any warranty made in selling or leasing the goods, warrants to its immediate purchaser only that

the document is genuine;

the transferor does not have knowledge of a fact that would impair the document’s validity or worth; and

the negotiation or delivery is rightful and fully effective with respect to the title to the document and the goods it represents.

History.

(§ 7.507 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 74 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the section, which read, “Warranties on negotiation or transfer of receipt or bill. If a person negotiates or transfers a document of title for value otherwise than as a mere intermediary under AS

45.07.508

, then, unless otherwise agreed, the person warrants to the immediate purchaser only in addition to any warranty made in selling the goods

“(1) that the document is genuine;

“(2) that the person has no knowledge of a fact that would impair its validity or worth; and

“(3) that the negotiation or transfer is rightful and fully effective with respect to the title to the document and the goods it represents.”

Sec. 45.07.508.
Warranties of collecting bank as to documents of title.

A collecting bank or other intermediary known to be entrusted with documents of title on behalf of another or with collection of a draft or other claim against delivery of documents warrants by the delivery of the documents only its own good faith and authority even if the collecting bank or other intermediary has purchased or made advances against the claim or draft to be collected.

History.

(§ 7.508 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 75 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading, added “of title” at the end; in the first sentence, added “of title” following “entrusted with documents”, and merged the second sentence into the first by substituting “even if the collecting bank or other” for “. This rule applies even though the intermediary” following “good faith and authority”.

Sec. 45.07.509.
Adequate compliance with commercial contract.

Whether a document of title is adequate to fulfill the obligations of a contract for sale or a contract for lease or the conditions of a letter of credit is determined by AS 45.02, AS 45.05, or AS 45.12.

History.

(§ 7.509 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 76 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the section, which read, “Receipt or bill: When adequate compliance with commercial contract. The question whether a document is adequate to fulfill the obligations of a contract for sale or the conditions of a credit is governed by AS 45.02 on sales and AS 45.05 on letters of credit.”